Morphonology/OrthToConv/Exceptions.lexc
LEXICON Root
Noun;
Adjective;
не		Adjective;
Numeral;

LEXICON Noun
зар|я́:зор'|а́		#;
д0н|о́:д*н|о́			#;
з0л|о́:з*л|о́			#;

LEXICON Adjective
з0л|о́й:з*л|о́й		#;
по́л0н|ый:по́л*н|ый	#;

LEXICON Numeral
во́семьдесят|:во́с'*м'дес'ат|	#;
восемьсо́т|:вос'*м'с*́т|		#;
